Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1250.02
Aircraft; owner, lessee, manager of hangar or land, report required; violation; penalty.

The owner, lessee, or manager of any aircraft hangar or land upon which is parked or located any aircraft as defined by section 3-101 shall report by February 1 of each year to the county assessor in the county in which such aircraft hangar or land is located all aircraft as defined by section 3-101 located thereon in such hangar or on such land as of January 1 of each year on a form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars.

Laws 1971, LB 26, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 105;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 58.